Mississippi, session 2026, SB2613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System of Mississippi shall open, maintain and manage an account that shall be designated the PERS Tier 5 COLA Account.  The board shall manage monies in the PERS Tier 5 COLA Account pursuant to applicable laws and the rules and regulations of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System of Mississippi as trustee of these funds. SECTION 2.  On July 1, 2026, and on every July 1 thereafter through and including July 1, 2035, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) from the State General Fund (Fund No. 2999000000) to the PERS Tier 5 COLA Account created in Section 1 of this act. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.